Massachusetts, session 194th, H3339.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 72.
As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Intentionally-added PFAS”, PFAS chemicals that are added to a product or that enter the
product from the manufacturing or processing of the product; provided, however, that the
manufacturer of the product knows, or is reasonably expected to know, or possesses or controls
information of the addition of PFAS chemicals; and provided further, that “intentionally-added
PFAS” shall include any degradation products containing PFAS chemicals or products for which
of 3

PFAS chemicals or PFAS precursors are used as a processing agent or mold release agent or
PFAS created by chemical reactions.
“Perfluoraolkyl and polyfluoraolkyl substances” or “PFAS chemicals”, a class of
fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom.
No state agency or state authority shall provide funding for the purchase, use or
installation of artificial turf that contains zinc, plastic, or intentionally-added perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances for any new or existing field. Any existing artificial turf field
containing zinc, plastic, or intentionally-added PFAS chemicals shall be allowed to be used for
its useful life but shall not be replaced with artificial turf containing zinc, plastic, or
intentionally-added PFAS chemicals.
SECTION 2. Chapter 40 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following section:-
Section 70.
“Intentionally-added PFAS”, PFAS chemicals that are added to a product or that enter the
product from the manufacturing or processing of the product; provided, however, that the
manufacturer of the product knows, or is reasonably expected to know, or possesses or controls
information of the addition of PFAS chemicals; and provided further, that “intentionally-added
PFAS” shall include any degradation products containing PFAS chemicals or products for which
PFAS chemicals or PFAS precursors are used as a processing agent or mold release agent or
PFAS created by chemical reactions.
“Local government”, a county, city, town or other municipal entity.
of 3

“Perfluoraolkyl and polyfluoraolkyl substances” or “PFAS chemicals”, a class of
fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom.
No local government shall provide funding for the purchase, use or installation of
artificial turf that contains zinc, plastic, or intentionally-added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances for any new or existing field. Any existing artificial turf field containing zinc, plastic,
or intentionally-added PFAS chemicals shall be allowed to be used for its useful life but shall not
be replaced with artificial turf containing zinc, plastic, or intentionally-added PFAS chemicals.
of 3